Washington statutes.
RCW 2.28.330

Privilege from civil arrest—Court facilities.

(1) No person is subject to civil arrest while going to, remaining at, or returning from, a court facility, except:

(a) Where such arrest is pursuant to a court order authorizing the arrest;

(b) When necessary to secure the immediate safety of judges, court staff, or the public; or

(c) Where circumstances otherwise permit warrantless arrest pursuant to RCW 10.31.100.

(2) For purposes of this section, "going to" and "returning from" includes the area within one mile of the court facility.

(3) Prior to any civil arrest in or on a court facility authorized by subsection (1)(a) of this section, a designated judicial officer shall review a court order authorizing any civil arrest to confirm compliance with subsection (1)(a) of this section.

(4) Nothing in this section narrows, or in any way lessens, any common law or other right or privilege of a person privileged from arrest pursuant to RCW 2.28.300 through 2.28.320 or otherwise.

[ 2020 c 37 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Short title—2020 c 37: See notes following RCW 2.28.300.